src-fst-root.lexc.md
# Tsuut'ina morphological analyser                      !
INTRODUCTION TO THE MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Tsuut'ina.

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

## Analysis symbols
The morphological analyses of wordforms of Tsuut'ina are presented
in this system in terms of the following symbols.
(It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

* +Asp	 asp, aspect
* +Dem	 D, demonstrative
* +Dim	 dim, diminutive
* +Du		 du, dual
* +Err/Orth  Substandard, not implemented
* +Foc	 foc, focus
* +Hab	 hab, habitual
* +Imprs	 impers, impersonal (+Impers?)
* +Inc	 inc, inceptive (Incpt?)
* +Inch	 incho, inchoative
* +Mod	 M mode (this seems more like category than property)
* +Mom	 momentaneous
* N+		 N, noun
* +Neg	 neg, negative
* +Num	 num, Numeral
* +PI+	 postposition incorporation (this is not a Morphosyn tag :-(
* +PNS     possessed noun suffix (this is not a Morphosyn tag :-(
* +Part    Part, particle
* +Pl		 pl, Plural
* +Po		 P, Postposition
* +Prt	 T, tense (past)
* +Qst	 Q, question marker
* +Qt		 Qt, quantifier
* +Sem/Hum		 Human
* +Sem/Obj	 O, Object (have a look at this)
* V+		 V, verb
* 12Du+	 12, first person dual inclusive
* 13Du+	 13, first person dual exclusive
* 1Pl+      12, first person plural inclusive
* 1PlO+    12, first person plural inclusive O
* 1Sg+	 1, first person singular
* 2Du+	 22, second person dual
* 2Sg+	 2
* 3Du+	 33, third person dual
* 3Sg+	 3
* 4Sg+	 4, the other

* PxSg1+   Px
* PxSg2+   Px
* PxSg3+   Px
* PxSg4+   Px

* Ar+		 5, areal subject, it (place, condition, weather)
* Impf+	 imp, imperfective (or prefix?)
* Iter+	 iter, iterative
* NI+		 NI, noun incorporation (probably not a tag)
* Opt+	 opt, optative
* Prf+	 perf, perfective
* Recipr+	 rec, reciprocal
* Refl+	 refl, reflexive
* Th+		 Th, thematic prefix  (probably not a tag)
* Unspec+	 0, Unspecified person
* UnspecO+	 0, Unspecified person
* UnspecS+	 0, Unspecified person
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

## Prefixes

## our flags

* @U.asp.perf@  
* @U.asp.ipfv@  

* @U.xaH.ON@   
* @R.xaH.ON@   
* @D.xaH@      

* @U.xaM.ON@    
* @R.xaM.ON@   
* @D.xaM@    

* @U.xaL.ON@   
* @R.xaL.ON@      
* @D.xaL@    

* @U.di.ON@   
* @R.di.ON@      
* @D.di@    

* @U.zi.ON@   
* @R.zi.ON@      
* @D.zi@    

* @U.na.ON@   
* @R.na.ON@      
* @D.na@    

* @U.ni.ON@   
* @R.ni.ON@      
* @D.ni@    

* @R.TV.ON@   
* @U.TV.ON@    
* @U.TV.OFF@    

## Archphonemes (multi-character definitions)

* %^VH       denoting floating high tone

## Border 

* %<   prefix border
* %>   suffix border

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

The word forms in Tsuut'ina start from noun and verb prefixes

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-srs/blob/main/src/fst/root.lexc)</small>

---
